Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Chapter 7. Bridge and Park Commissions

§ 55-7-1.
Purpose of chapter.

Since the continuing and growing economic and commercial development of navigation, harbor facilities, boat and related facilities along, in or near the navigable waters of the state is of general importance to the whole state and should be encouraged and assisted by legislative enactment, this chapter is hereby enacted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-3.
General grant of authority to certain municipalities and counties.

The governing authorities of any municipality bordering on the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a port or harbor through which commerce flows, and having in its corporate limits one or more industries engaged in the seafood industry, and the governing authorities of any county in the State of Mississippi bordering on the Mississippi Sound or the Gulf of Mexico in which county there is or may hereafter be located a municipality having a harbor or port of entry where commodities are exported to foreign nations and in which county the assessed valuation is more than thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000.00) and less than ninety million dollars ($90,000,000.00), are hereby given the authority to engage in, either directly or through the commission provided for and designated in this chapter, in cooperation and conjunction with such other agencies or commissions as may be now or hereinafter provided by law, works of internal improvement, and of promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining and operating harbors or seaports within the state and its jurisdiction, and are otherwise vested with full power and authority to do and perform, either directly or through said commission, all of the acts, functions and things set forth in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-5.
Creation of commission; composition; qualifications, appointment, terms of office, oath, and bond of members.

Such municipality and/or such county shall have the authority to establish by ordinance a bridge and park commission as a municipal agency of said municipality or as a county agency of said county to be known and designated as the “bridge and park commission.”

Such bridge and park commission, where it is a municipal agency, shall be composed of five (5) commissioners who shall be residents of the municipality and qualified electors therein, and shall be appointed by the governing authorities of said municipality. Such bridge and park commission, where it is a county agency, shall be composed of five (5) commissioners who shall be residents of the county and qualified electors therein, and shall be appointed by the governing authorities of said county.

At the time of the first appointment, one (1) of the commissioners shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year, one (1) shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years, one (1) shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years, one (1) shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years, and one (1) shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years, until his successor shall have been appointed and qualified. Thereafter, one (1) commissioner shall be appointed annually for a term of five (5)years, and until his successor shall have been appointed and qualified.

Said commissioners shall take the oath of office required by Section 268 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi.

Said commissioners shall give bond payable to the municipality, where it is a municipal agency, or to the county, where it is a county agency, in an amount to be fixed by the appropriate governing authorities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-7.
Organization; vacancies; commissioners not to be pecuniarily interested in activities of commission; meetings.

Promptly upon the appointment of the commission and annually thereafter, the commission shall organize by the election of one of its members as president and one of its members as vice-president, and shall select a treasurer and a secretary who may or may not be members of the commission, and who may be the same person. Such treasurer and secretary shall perform the usual duties of such officers and such other duties as may from time to time be prescribed by the commission, and shall receive such compensation as may be fixed by the commission, payable, however, solely from the funds received by the commission.

Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term by the governing authorities of the municipality or of the county, as the case may be.

No commissioner shall be pecuniarily interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract for work to be done by or for the commission, or in the purchase or sale of any properties by or for the commission, and any such contract, purchase or sale in which any commissioner shall be so interested, directly or indirectly, shall be null and void as to such commissioner, his successors or assigns.

The commission shall have power to establish the time of its regular meetings and to provide for the call of special meetings by the president or by any two members of the commission. Any special meeting at which all commissioners are present shall be conclusively deemed to have been properly called, and action taken at such meeting shall be valid and binding. All meetings of the municipal commission shall be open to the public and shall be held at the city hall in the municipality or other meeting place of the governing authority of the municipality. All meetings of the county commission shall be open to the public and shall be held at the courthouse in the county or other meeting place of the governing authority of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-03; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).

§ 55-7-9.
Compensation of members of commission.

Each member of the commission created under the provisions of this chapter shall receive as compensation twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day while engaged in attendance of meetings of the commission or engaged in other duties of the commission, not to exceed one hundred fifty (150) days in any one (1) year. Each member shall receive his actual traveling expenses, to be audited and allowed by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).

§ 55-7-11.
General powers of commission.

The bridge and park commission shall have power to sue and be sued, contract and be contracted with, to adopt and alter a corporate seal, and to exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire private property necessary for the accomplishment of the purposes for which such commission is created.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).

§ 55-7-13.
Acquisition of lands by commission; authorization.

The bridge and park commission shall have the power, among others, in the case of the municipal agency, to acquire for park, recreational, harbor development and other similar purposes, by the exercise of eminent domain or otherwise, and by gift, grant or purchase, for any purpose of this chapter, an island or islands, in whole or in part, situated in the Gulf of Mexico or in the Mississippi Sound, and lying within three leagues of the nearest point of the corporate limits of the municipality involved; and, in the case of the county agency, to acquire for park, recreational, harbor development and other similar purposes by the exercise of eminent domain or otherwise, and by gift, grant or purchase, for any purpose of this chapter, an island or islands, in whole or in part, situated in the Gulf of Mexico or in the Mississippi Sound, and lying within the boundaries of the county involved.

Said commission shall have the power to acquire, by eminent domain, gift, grant or purchase, such portion or portions of such island or islands as it may find to be needed for use in developing and financing the public improvements set forth in this chapter. Prior to the acquisition of any such real estate, the commission shall, by resolution spread upon its minutes, find, determine and adjudicate that the property to be so acquired is needed to aid in the financing of the improvements under this chapter.

Any such commission which has acquired an island or islands, in whole or in part, adjacent to any submerged lands belonging to the State of Mississippi may purchase from the State of Mississippi a sufficient amount of such submerged lands to be reclaimed and added to such island or islands to be used, and developed for the purposes provided in this chapter. The state land commissioner, with the approval of the attorney general and the governor, is hereby authorized and empowered to sell and convey such submerged lands to such commission and to issue the state’s patent thereto. Said commission shall have the power to dredge, fill in and reclaim submerged lands adjacent to any such island or islands and to develop and utilize the same for any of the purposes set forth in this chapter, including the financing of the authorized public improvements. However, no normal or natural channel shall be obstructed so as to interfere with the normal navigation therein, it being the purpose and intention of this chapter to authorize the use and development of shallow bottoms and shoal waters in the areas herein set out for the purpose of filling and reclaiming same for the purposes herein set forth and where said bottoms are not susceptible to reasonable navigation at all times as a practical matter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20; Laws, 1966, ch. 274, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 3, 1966).

§ 55-7-15.
Acquisition of lands by commission; confirmation of title to submerged lands.

The bridge and park commission which has acquired submerged lands, and before such lands have been reclaimed, shall bring its suit in the chancery court of the county in which such lands lie, against the state and all the world for confirmation of the commission’s title to such submerged lands, as provided by law for the confirmation of patents issued by the state. Upon the hearing of such cause, if the court shall find that the reclamation of the said lands does not constitute an obstruction of the navigable waters of the state and does not interfere with the rights of the public generally to use the navigable waters of the state for fishing, boating, and other public uses, and that the reclamation and sale of said lands has or will, in whole or in part, contribute toward the deepening of a channel or channels for boats and improvement of navigation of any of the navigable waters of this state, and that a fair and adequate consideration has been paid or is to be paid for such property, then the court shall confirm the title to the property and forever set at rest any claims by the State of Mississippi in its sovereign capacity as proprietor of said lands.

Any of the parties of the suit may appeal as in other proceedings in chancery, provided any interlocutory appeal is taken within ten (10) days after the rendition of the decree from which the appeal is desired and provided that any final appeal is taken within sixty (60) days from the date of the rendition of the final decree. Any title perfected by a decree in a suit under this section shall forever estop and preclude the state and other parties from thereafter questioning the validity of the patent and deed involved in such proceedings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20; Laws, 1966, ch. 274, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 3, 1966).

§ 55-7-17.
Construction, operation, etc., of bridges, ferries, causeways, and tunnels by commission.

The bridge and park commission shall have power to construct, build, maintain, operate, reconstruct and repair a bridge or bridges, a ferry or ferries, a causeway or causeways, or a tunnel or tunnels, or any combination thereof, connecting any island acquired, in whole or in part, by the commission, with the mainland. The point of connection of any such bridge, causeway or tunnel with the mainland may be within or without the corporate limits of the municipality in the case of a municipal agency and may be within or without the county limits of the county in the case of a county agency. Said commission shall further have the power to acquire by a gift, grant, purchase, the exercise of eminent domain, or otherwise, land for approaches to any such bridge, ferry, causeway or tunnel, and to construct, build, maintain, operate, reconstruct and repair approaches to any such bridge, ferry, causeway or tunnel connecting any such island or part thereof with the mainland.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20; Laws, 1966, ch. 274, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 3, 1966).

§ 55-7-19.
Improvement, etc., of lands acquired by commission.

The bridge and park commission shall have power to establish, acquire, complete, enlarge, ornament, build, rebuild and improve in, or on, or about any island or part thereof, acquired by the commission, public parks, boulevards, bridges, viaducts and approaches thereto, wharves, piers, harbors, marinas, jetties, air landing fields, basins, short protection works, pleasure grounds and ways, walks, pathways, driveways, roadways, highways, and all public works, grounds or improvements, buildings, field houses, stadiums, shelters, conservatories, schools, golf courses, museums, service shops, power plants, structures, playground devices, boulevard and building lighting systems, water systems, sewer systems and all of the types of permanent improvements and construction necessary to render the property under the control of said commission usable for the enjoyment thereof as public parks, parkways, boulevards, and pleasureways, or otherwise, as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20; Laws, 1966, ch. 274, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 3, 1966).

§ 55-7-21.
Leasing and sale of lands and interests acquired by commission.

The park and bridge commission shall have power to lease or sell to private persons or corporations, real estate or any interest therein, acquired by said commission, whether improved or unimproved, and including reclaimed or filled-in lands, whenever it shall find such real estate or interest therein is or has become unnecessary for park or recreational purposes for the benefit of the public, or for other public use, and in the event of sale, to convey to the grantee, fee simple title to such real estate. Prior to the leasing or conveyance of any such real estate, the commission shall, by resolution spread upon its minutes, find, determine and adjudicate that the property, to be so leased or sold and conveyed, is, or has become unnecessary for park and recreational purposes for the benefit of the public, or other public use. Such findings, determination and adjudication shall be final and conclusive and shall not thereafter be questioned in any court. However, lands acquired by eminent domain under the provisions of this chapter may not be sold, and may not be leased except for public purposes and continuing public uses, and when such lands cease to be used for public purposes, the title to same shall revert to the former owners, or their successors or assigns.

The bridge and park commission shall have power to sell or lease to private persons, or corporations, real estate other than the submerged lands reclaimed by it, whether improved or unimproved, whenever it shall find such real estate is or has become unnecessary for park, recreational or harbor development purposes for the benefit of the public, and to convey to the grantee the fee simple title to such real estate. Said commission shall have the power to lease the submerged lands reclaimed by it for a period not exceeding ninety-nine (99) years upon such terms and provisions and for such consideration as it may determine. After any of such lands have been developed, if the commission finds, by resolution spread on its minutes, that it is impractical to lease the same and that it is more advantageous to the public interest to sell such lands, the commission shall have the power to sell the same in fee simple. Prior to the conveyance or lease of any such real estate, the commission shall, by resolution spread upon its minutes, find, determine and adjudicate that the property so to be conveyed or leased is or has become unnecessary for park, recreational or harbor development purposes for the benefit of the public.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20; Laws, 1966, ch. 274, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 3, 1966).

§ 55-7-23.
Power to fix and collect rates, fees, charges and tolls for use of services and facilities.

The bridge and park commission shall have the power to fix and collect rates, fees, charges, and tolls for the use of any bridge, tunnel or causeway constructed and operated by it and for the use of any other service or facility provided by it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20; Laws, 1966, ch. 274, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 3, 1966).

§ 55-7-25.
Employment of personnel by commission.

The bridge and park commission shall have power to appoint and employ such officers, agents, attorneys, engineers, architects, financial consultants, and employees as the commission may find to be necessary to perform the services required and authorized under this chapter, and to prescribe the duties and compensation of all such persons. The compensation of all such persons shall be paid from funds received by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20; Laws, 1966, ch. 274, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 3, 1966).

§ 55-7-27.
Dredging, etc., of channels.

The bridge and park commission shall have the power and is authorized, in connection with its work of development and functions as provided in this chapter, to dredge, deepen and widen any adjacent or existing channels, when this may be done consistently with and in aid of normal navigation and harbor development in the area, being authorized to deposit the spoil, and fill in the bottoms contiguous and adjoining the island, or parts thereof, authorized to be filled in and reclaimed, for the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20; Laws, 1966, ch. 274, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 3, 1966).

§ 55-7-29.
Acceptance of federal aid and assistance.

Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, the bridge and park commission shall have the power and is authorized, in connection with its work of development and functions as provided in this chapter, to accept contributions or loans from the United States, or a federal department, instrumentality, or agency for financing or aiding in the financing of the cost of preliminary investigations and studies, surveys, plans and specifications, procedures and other action preliminary to construction, and the construction, maintenance and operation of anything authorized in this chapter.

The commission may enter into contracts and cooperate with the United States or a federal department, instrumentality, or agency in the making of preliminary investigations, studies and surveys, preparation of plans and specifications and in the accomplishment of procedures and other action preliminary to construction, and the construction, maintenance and operation, and in financing or aiding in financing the cost of preliminary investigations and studies, surveys, plans and specifications, procedures and other action preliminary to construction and of the construction, maintenance, and operation of anything authorized in this chapter. The commission may do any and all things necessary to avail itself of such aid and cooperation, so long as such action is in strict accordance with the laws of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20; Laws, 1966, ch. 274, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 3, 1966).

§ 55-7-31.
Disposition of revenues of commission.

All revenues, income and moneys received by the bridge and park commission shall be deposited in the depository or depositories which shall be selected by the governing authorities of the municipality or county, in the same manner as depositories are selected for said municipality or county, and shall at all times be secured in the manner provided by law for the securing of deposits of municipalities or counties. Any such depository shall hold such funds in an account in all respects separate and distinct from the accounts in which the other funds of the municipality or county are held, and separate and distinct from all other accounts. In the event that bonds should be issued, as hereinafter provided in this chapter, payable from the income of the commission, then such depository shall hold, manage and account for the funds of the commission in accordance with any resolution authorizing such bonds adopted by the bridge and park commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).

§ 55-7-33.
Issuance of bonds by commission generally.

For the purpose of providing funds for the corporate purposes of the bridge and park commission, the commission shall have power to borrow money and to issue its bonds in evidence thereof, payable from the income and revenues derived and to be derived from the operation of any of the facilities acquired, owned and operated by the commission, including, without limiting, the generality of the rates, fees, charges and tolls to be charged for the use of any bridge or causeway or for the service and use of any facility operated by the commission, from any sums received from concessionaires and lessees, and from any sums received from the sale, lease or rental of real estate. Any indebtedness so created or any bonds so issued shall not become an obligation or liability of the municipality or of the county nor shall the power of taxation of said city or said county be pledged to the payment thereof nor shall any of the funds of the municipality or county be used or expended for the payment of any such bonds either as to principal or interest, except as hereafter set forth in this chapter. No limitations of indebtedness upon the issuance of bonds by any political subdivision, municipal corporation or county in the State of Mississippi shall apply to the bonds hereby authorized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-06; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 6; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-35.
Imposition of tax levy for payment of bonds.

If the bridge and park commission shall determine by order entered upon its minutes and the governing authorities of the municipality or county concerned concur in the findings of the commission by order entered upon its minutes that in order to render the bonds to be issued under Section 55-7-33 salable or to obtain a more favorable rate of interest, that the tax levy hereby authorized is required, then the governing authorities of the municipality or county are authorized to provide for an annual levy during the life of the bonds issued hereunder, not to exceed four mills, upon all of the taxable property within the municipality or county in order to provide additional funds for the payment of the principal and interest of said bonds, and for the sinking funds as may be provided for by the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

However, before the governing authorities of the municipalities or counties shall make any tax levy as authorized in this section, such levy shall be authorized by a sixty percent (60%) majority of the qualified electors of the municipality or county voting in a special election held in the manner provided by law.

If bonds are issued payable partially from ad valorem taxes, it shall be the duty of the governing authorities of the municipality or county to levy a tax sufficient each year, together with pledged revenues other than the taxes authorized hereunder, to pay the bonds and interest thereon as such bonds and interest become due, and to provide the sinking funds set forth in the order authorizing the issuance thereof. However, in no event shall a tax levied exceed the amount authorized in the first instance by the governing authorities of the municipality or county. Any part of this tax levy lost through homestead exemption shall not be reimbursed by the state.

If during any year all or any portion of the levy authorized hereby is not necessary to pay the principal and interest of the bonds falling due during the succeeding calendar year and to provide the sinking fund or funds required, and the commission and governing authorities of the municipality or county so find, by order entered upon their minutes, such levy shall not be made for that year to the extent that it is not necessary for such purposes.

As used in this section the word “taxes” shall include, but without limitation, all levies on an ad valorem basis upon land or real property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-06; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 6; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-37.
Division of ad valorem taxes on commission’s property.

Any ad valorem taxes levied each year by or for the benefit of any city, county, city and county, district, or other public corporation (hereinafter sometimes called “taxing agencies”), upon any real property which is acquired by the commission and leased or sold to private persons or corporations pursuant to Section 55-7-21, after the date of acquisition of said real property by the commission, shall be divided as follows:

Portion of taxes based on last assessment roll before acquisition of property by the commission. That portion of the taxes which would be produced by the rate upon which the tax is levied each year by or for each of said taxing agencies upon the total sum of the assessed value of the taxable property acquired by the commission as shown upon the assessment roll used in connection with the taxation of such property by such taxing agency, last equalized prior to the date of acquisition by the commission, shall be allocated to and when collected shall be paid into the funds of the respective taxing agencies as taxes by or for said taxing agencies on all other property are paid (for the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing agency or agencies which did not include the property acquired by the commission on the effective date or otherwise acquired, the assessment roll of the county last equalized on the date of acquisition by the commission shall be used in determining the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the project on said effective date); and

Portion of taxes in excess of amount. That portion of said levied taxes each year in excess of such amount shall be allocated to and when collected shall be paid into a special fund of the commission to pay the principal of and interest on any bonds or securities issued by the commission pursuant to its authority under this chapter. Unless and until the total assessed valuation of the taxable property acquired by the commission exceeds the total assessed value of the taxable property as shown by the last equalized assessment roll referred to in paragraph No. (1) hereof, all of the taxes levied and collected upon the taxable property shall be paid into the funds of the respective taxing agencies. When said bonds or securities issued by the commission pursuant to its authority under this chapter have been paid, all moneys thereafter received from taxes upon the taxable property acquired by the commission shall be paid into the funds of the respective taxing agencies as taxes on all other property are paid.

In any proceedings for the issuance of any bonds or securities by the commission to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, any activities under this chapter, the portion of the taxes mentioned in paragraph No. (2), may be irrevocably pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on said bonds or securities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-06; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 6; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-39.
Details of bonds; execution and sale of bonds.

Any such bonds authorized by Section 55-7-33 shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by the bridge and park commission, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding, however, six percent (6%) per annum, shall be in such denomination or denominations, shall be payable both as to principal and interest at such place or places and shall mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date thereof, all as may be provided by such resolution. If so specified in such resolution, such bonds may be redeemable prior to their respective maturities with or without premium and on such notice as shall be provided for by such resolution. Such bonds may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices as the commission shall determine, provided the interest cost to maturity of the money received from any issue of said bonds or other obligations shall not exceed six percent (6%) per annum. If any such bonds are sold at less than par, then the price to be paid therefor shall be such that the interest cost to the commission on the money actually received for such bonds shall not exceed six percent (6%) per annum computed to their absolute maturity according to standard bond value tables. Such bonds shall be executed in such a manner as may be directed in the resolution which authorized the bonds. Interest coupons to be attached to such bonds may be executed by facsimile signatures.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-07; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 7; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-41.
Security for payment of bonds generally.

The bridge and park commission, in the issuance of any bonds or securities pursuant to its authority under this chapter, or any other statute, may, in its discretion, authorize and have inserted in such bonds or securities a provision to the effect that such bonds or securities shall constitute a lien upon all or any specified portion of the property which the commission is authorized to transfer, convey or sell to private individuals, with right of foreclosure of such lien to be vested in the holder or holders of such securities or bonds, upon terms and conditions such as may be approved by said commission and set out in such securities or bonds, and such provisions thus approved and inserted therein shall constitute and effect a valid lien on the property as specified. Further, all or any part of the proceeds from the authorized transfer, conveyance or sale of lots or other property of the commission to private individuals may be pledged by the commission, in its discretion, as security for any bonds or other securities lawfully issued or to be issued by it, upon such terms and conditions as said commission may provide.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-07; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 7; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-43.
Pledge of income, revenues and grants for payment of bonds; contents of bond issue resolution.

Whenever bonds are issued by the bridge and park commission under this chapter, an amount of the income, revenues or grants from all sources received by the commission, after the deduction of the necessary expenses of operating and maintaining the facilities and properties of said commission, shall be pledged in an amount sufficient for the purpose of the payment of the principal of and interest on said bonds as the same shall mature and accrue. The resolution authorizing such bonds shall contain such covenants as may be deemed necessary or advisable for the assurance of payment of the bonds thereby authorized and may contain such restrictions upon the issuance of additional bonds by the commission as may be deemed advisable. Such resolution may direct the depository in which funds of the commission are held to remit to the paying agent designated for such bonds specified periodic remittances without further direction or authorization by the commission and may provide for the establishment of funds for operation and maintenance, for depreciation, for the payment of principal and interest and for contingencies, and may provide for the setting aside of amounts over and above those necessary for current debt service so as to provide and produce a reserved fund to meet any possible deficiency in future years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-08; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 8; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-45.
Pledge of or payments from revenue derived through Section 65-33-45.

No bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be secured by pledge of or be paid, either as to principal or interest, from, any revenue derived through Section 65-33-45.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-08.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 55-7-47.
Validation of bonds.

Any bonds which may be authorized to be issued by the bridge and park commission may be submitted to validation as provided by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-09; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).

§ 55-7-49.
Rates, fees, charges, and tolls for services or use of facilities.

Whenever such bonds are issued by the bridge and park commission, the rates, fees, charges and tolls to be established for the use of any bridge or causeway or for the services or use of any of the facilities owned or operated by the commission, or to be received by it from concessionaires or lessees, and from the lease or sale of any lands under the control of the commission and other sources, shall be such as to produce an aggregate amount sufficient at all times to pay the cost of operation and maintenance of any bridge, causeway or other property or facility of the commission, to pay the principal of and the interest on all bonds issued by the commission as the same shall mature and accrue, and to provide adequate reserve and contingent funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-10; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).

§ 55-7-51.
Enforcement of rights of bondholders.

The holder of any bond issued by the bridge and park commission or of any coupon attached thereto, may in any civil action, mandamus or other proceedings enforce and compel all duties required of the commission or any officer thereof by this chapter or by resolution authorizing issuance of bonds hereunder, including the establishment and collection of adequate rates, fees, charges and tolls, and the performance of any duties imposed upon the commission or any of its members or officers by the resolution authorizing such bonds, and such action shall lie, regardless of whether or not the bonds shall, at the time of such action, be in default either as to principal or interest, in the event that the commission or any of its officers or members shall fail to perform the duties or obligations imposed on it or them by the resolution which authorized such bonds. If there be any default in payment of the interest on any principal of any of said bonds, any court having jurisdiction in the proper action, may, upon petition of the holder of any of such bonds, appoint a receiver to administer and operate the system, consisting of the park, recreational and harbor area and facilities, all bridges, buildings, improvements, and related facilities in connection therewith, with the power to fix rates and collect charges sufficient to provide for the payment of all bonds outstanding to the payment of which the revenues of such system are pledged and to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining such system and to apply the revenues of such system in conformity with the provisions of this chapter, and of the order or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-11; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).

§ 55-7-53.
Incorporation of islands into municipality.

In connection with the exercise of the right and authority granted under the terms of this chapter, any municipality involved shall have the right to incorporate the island or islands aforesaid, in whole or in part, into the municipality in the same manner and upon compliance with the same conditions precedent now provided by statute for the incorporation of adjacent lands into municipalities in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-12; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).

§ 55-7-55.
Cooperation with other state entities.

In connection with any harbor development and in connection with the construction of causeways, bridges, tunnels or approaches to the development as provided for in this chapter, the municipality or county and the bridge and park commission shall have full power and authority to cooperate with and provide the same in conjunction or jointly and in connection with any other commission or political body created and existing under the laws of the State of Mississippi, including the State of Mississippi. Said joint construction or undertaking shall be upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the political bodies or entities involved and shall be carried out in such manner that there may be no conflict as between the political bodies or subdivision involved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-14; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).